Wyoming, session 2025, HB0188.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 14-4-102(b) by creating a new
paragraph (xii) is amended to read:
14-4-102. Certification required; exceptions.
(b) W.S. 14-4-101 through 14-4-111 do not apply to:
(xii) Child care by a person employed to care
for not more than four (4) children from multiple families,
with not more than two (2) children under the age of two
(2) years and at the home of one (1) of the children's
parents or guardians.
Section 2. The department of family services shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0188
ENROLLED ACT NO. 37, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2